Washington statutes.
RCW 36.37.110

Poultry shows—Conduct of shows.

All such poultry shows shall be held under the rules of the American Poultry Association and only licensed poultry judges shall be employed thereat.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.37.110. Prior: 1929 c 109 s 3; RRS s 2755-3.]